District of Columbia statutes.
22-2501

Possession of implements of crime; penalty.

No person shall have in his or her possession in the District any instrument, tool, or implement for picking locks or pockets, with the intent to use such instrument, tool, or implement to commit a crime. Whoever violates this section shall be imprisoned for not more than 180 days and may be fined not more than and, in addition, may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01, unless the violation occurs after he or she has been convicted in the District of a violation of this section or of a felony, either in the District or another jurisdiction, in which case he or she shall be imprisoned for not less than one year nor more than 5 years and, in addition, may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 97, ch. 159, § 209(a)
Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 604(a)(2), 28 DCR 3081
Nov. 17, 1981, D.C. Law 4-52, § 3(g), 28 DCR 4348
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 9(c), 41 DCR 1639
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 110(b), 41 DCR 2608
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 11, 44 DCR 1408
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, §§ 202(b), 305, 60 DCR 2064
District defined, see § 1-201.03.
Minimum sentences, convictions under this section, see § 24-403.
Sentencing, supervised release, and good time credit for felonies under this section committed on or after August 5, 2000, see § 24-403.01.
This section is referenced in § 24-403 and § 24-403.01.
1981 Ed., § 22-3601.
1973 Ed., § 22-3601.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not more than $1,000”; and added “and, in addition, may be fined not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” at the end of the last sentence.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 110(b) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see §§ 202(b) and 305 of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.